New York, session 2025-2026, A10497.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Item (A) of subclause 1 of clause (ii) of subparagraph 1 of 2 paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 88 of the navigation law, as 3 amended by chapter 413 of the laws of 2022, and subitems (iii), (iv), 4 (v) and (vi) as amended by chapter 128 of the laws of 2024, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 (A) (i) The following rate table shall be used to calculate base pilo- 7 tage tariffs: 8 PILOTAGE UNITS (P.U.) TARIFF 9 [0 to 24.99 $800 10 25 to 49.99 $942 11 50 to 99.99 $1163 12 100 to 499.99 $(11.72 x P.U.) 13 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 1.57) + 5860 14 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 3.74) + 7745 15 (ii) Effective January first, two thousand twenty-three, the following 16 rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 17 0 to 24.99 $824 18 25 to 49.99 $970 19 50 to 99.99 $1198 20 100 to 499.99 $(12.07 x P.U.) 21 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 1.62) + 6036 22 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 3.85) + 7986 23 (iii) Effective January first, two thousand twenty-four, the following 24 rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 25 0 to 24.99 $849 26 25 to 49.99 $999 27 50 to 99.99 $1234 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15090-01-6 A. 10497 2 1 100 to 499.99 $(12.43 x P.U.) 2 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 1.67) + 6217 3 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 4.70) + 8225 4 (iv) Effective January first, two thousand twenty-five, the following 5 rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 6 0 to 24.99 $874 7 25 to 49.99 $1029 8 50 to 99.99 $1271 9 100 to 499.99 $(12.81 x P.U.) 10 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 1.72) + 6403 11 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 4.85) + 8472 12 (v) Effective January first, two thousand twenty-six, the following 13 rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs:] 14 0 to 24.99 $900 15 25 to 49.99 $1060 16 50 to 99.99 $1309 17 100 to 499.99 $(13.19 x P.U.) 18 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 1.77) + 6595 19 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 5.00) + 8726 20 [(vi)] (ii) Effective January first, two thousand twenty-seven, the 21 following rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 22 0 to 24.99 $927 23 25 to 49.99 $1092 24 50 to 99.99 $1348 25 100 to 499.99 $(13.59 x P.U.) 26 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 1.82) + 6793 27 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 5.15) + 8988 28 (iii) Effective January first, two thousand twenty-eight, the follow- 29 ing rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 30 0 to 24.99 $946 31 25 to 49.99 $1114 32 50 to 99.99 $1386 33 100 to 499.99 $(14.41 x P.U.) 34 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 1.92) + 7201 35 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 5.40) + 9438 36 (iv) Effective January first, two thousand twenty-nine, the following 37 rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 38 0 to 24.99 $965 39 25 to 49.99 $1136 40 50 to 99.99 $1427 41 100 to 499.99 $(15.27 x P.U.) 42 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 2.02) + 7633 43 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 5.65) + 9910 44 (v) Effective January first, two thousand thirty, the following rate 45 table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 46 0 to 24.99 $984 47 25 to 49.99 $1159 48 50 to 99.99 $1470 49 100 to 499.99 $(16.19 x P.U.) 50 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 2.12) + 8091 51 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 5.90) + 10406 52 (vi) Effective January first, two thousand thirty-one, the following 53 rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 54 0 to 24.99 $1004 55 25 to 49.99 $1182 56 50 to 99.99 $1514 A. 10497 3 1 100 to 499.99 $(17.16 x P.U.) 2 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 2.32) + 8576 3 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 6.15) + 10926 4 (vii) Effective January first, two thousand thirty-two, the following 5 rate table shall be used to calculate base pilotage tariffs: 6 0 to 24.99 $1024 7 25 to 49.99 $1206 8 50 to 99.99 $1559 9 100 to 499.99 $(18.19 x P.U.) 10 500 to 1649.99 $((P.U. - 500) x 2.42) + 9091 11 1650 and up $((P.U. - 1650) x 6.40) + 11472 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.